Massachusetts, session 194th, H1431.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 19 of chapter 15A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 44, the word “state-supported”.
SECTION 2. Said section 19 of said chapter 15A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by inserting after the word “provide”, in line 58, the following word:- full.
of 1